District of Columbia statutes.
24-608

Limitation of application of chapter.

The provisions of this subchapter shall apply to chronic alcoholics who have not been determined to be mentally ill. The handling of a chronic alcoholic who has been determined to be mentally ill shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 5 of Title 21.

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 745, ch. 472, § 8
Aug. 3, 1968, 82 Stat. 622, Pub. L. 90-452, § 3(a)
1981 Ed., § 24-528.
1973 Ed., § 24-528.